Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
General Duties of Common and Restricted Common Carriers

§ 77-7-151.
Duties of common carriers of household goods by motor vehicle as to service and rates.

It shall be the duty of every common carrier of household goods by motor vehicle to provide safe and adequate service, equipment and facilities for the transportation of household goods.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7657; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-153.
Discrimination by common carriers prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any common carrier by motor vehicle, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, to make, give or cause any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any particular person, port, gateway, locality or description of traffic in any respect whatsoever, or to subject any particular persons, port, gateway, locality or description of traffic to any unjust discrimination or any undue or unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever. However, this section shall not be construed to apply to discriminations, prejudice or disadvantage to the traffic of any other carrier of whatever description.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7659; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 8; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.